Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 5. Loans

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

11 Am. Jur. 2d Banks §§ 999 to 1011.

Recoverability of compensatory damages for mental anguish or emotional distress for breach of contract to lend money, 52 ALR4th 826.

12A C.J.S. Building and Loan Associations §§ 159 to 185.

§ 13-7-501.
General requirements.

For every loan made, except a loan from one (1) association to another, a note or bond specifying the amount loaned and the rate of interest and premium to be paid, secured by first mortgage on improved real estate, shall be taken. A complete abstract of title for the real estate signed by the person or corporation furnishing the abstract which shall be examined by a competent attorney-at-law and his opinion furnished approving the title and showing that the mortgage is a first lien, or a policy of title insurance of a reliable title insurance company authorized to issue insurance on titles within this state, or a duplicate certificate of ownership issued by a registrar of titles, shall be furnished. No mortgage loan shall be made except upon the report in writing of an appraiser or a committee of appraisers appointed by the board of directors which shall state the conservative value of the mortgage security. The directors may also loan upon the security of savings on deposit in the association to the amount of ninety percent (90%) of their withdrawal value, and may loan upon or invest in bonds of the United States and the state of Wyoming, in real property loans insured by the federal housing administration or guaranteed by the veterans administration, and in classes of bonds and warrants of the counties, school districts and other municipalities, as well as local improvement districts in this state, as the state banking commissioner may from time to time approve but no association shall loan any of its funds to an officer or director of the association.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 17-109; C.S. 1945, § 36-110; Laws 1955, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-223; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mortgagee-lender's duty, in disbursing funds, to protect mortgagor against outstanding or potential mechanics' liens against the mortgaged property, 30 ALR4th 134.

Vendor's action against vendee's prospective lender for misrepresentation respecting or failure to complete loan commitment, 30 ALR4th 474.

Construction and application of Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (12 USCS §§ 2601 et seq.), 142 ALR Fed 511.

§ 13-7-502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 9, related to loans to or from other associations.